Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB668.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Liquified petroleum gas," "propane," or "LPG" has the same meaning as
in KRS 186.750;
(b) "Liquified petroleum gas tank" or "LPG tank" means an above-or below-
ground cylinder, container, or receptacle, which is fixed in place and
designed to store LPG for the purpose of heating or generating electric
power for a residential customer;
(c) "Qualifying emergency" means:
1. A federal, state, or local state of emergency that has been declared;
2. A federal or state authority has granted a waiver from hours-of-
operation limitations affecting LPG; or
3. Severe weather or any other similar circumstances exist that may
result in:
1. An individual being placed in imminent danger of death or
injury; or
2. A building structure or the structure's fixtures being at risk of
significant damage due to a lack of residential heat caused by the
lack of sufficient LPG;
(d) "Regular supplier" means a person, firm, limited liability company, or
corporation that:
1. Owns an LPG tank; and
2. Pursuant to a current contract, has agreed to supply LPG to the LPG
tank for use by a residential customer;
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/18/2026 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2083
(e) "Temporary emergency supplier" means a person, firm, limited liability
company, or corporation that fills, refills, or otherwise delivers LPG into an
LPG tank that:
1. The temporary emergency supplier does not own; and
2. Is subject to an existing contract between a regular supplier and a
residential customer.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, when a qualifying
emergency is in effect and a residential customer who has a contract with a
regular supplier to fill a LPG tank reasonably believes the amount of LPG will be
insufficient to meet the customer's heating needs, the customer may arrange to
have a temporary emergency supplier fill, refill, or otherwise deliver LPG into the
LPG tank under the following conditions:
(a) The customer makes a good-faith effort to procure delivery of LPG from the
regular supplier;
(b) The regular supplier is unable to make a scheduled delivery or fulfill the
customer's good-faith request, directly or through another supplier, for
delivery within twenty-four (24) hours; and
(c) The temporary emergency supplier ensures that the LPG tank and the
devices and pipelines operated in connection with the tank have been
inspected and certified as required by law.
(3) The temporary emergency supplier that fills, refills, or otherwise delivers LPG
under this section shall notify the regular supplier, in written or electronic form,
within five (5) business days of delivering the LPG. The temporary emergency
supplier shall provide the:
(a) Customer's name and address;
(b) Date and quantity of LPG delivered to the customer;
(c) Changes made to the tank system, if any; and
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/18/2026 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2083
(d) Pressure test results, if required.
(4) When a temporary emergency supplier delivers LPG to a residential customer
during a period in which subsection (2) of this section does not apply, the
temporary emergency supplier or the customer's regular supplier shall not charge
any penalty or fee in addition to any filling, refilling, or delivery fees that are
usually charged to other customers in the ordinary course of business.
(5) The temporary emergency supplier shall assume all liability from the improper
filling, inspection, or testing of the LPG tank owned by the regular supplier.
(6) (a) Any contract executed after the effective date of this Act for the supply of
LPG to a residential customer shall include provisions that:
1. Allow a residential customer to use a temporary emergency supplier
under the conditions set forth in subsection (2) of this section; and
2. Do not impose additional penalties or fees in violation of subsection
(4) of this section.
(b) Any provision of a contract executed prior to the effective date of this Act
for the supply of LPG to a residential customer that prohibits a residential
customer from using a temporary emergency supplier under the conditions
set forth in subsection (2) of this section or imposes additional penalties or
fees in violation of subsection (4) of this section shall be void.
(7) (a) The Attorney General shall develop a Propane Customer Bill of Rights
consistent with this Section to address the rights of residential customers
who enter into contracts for the provision and delivery of LPG, including
the right of the customer to purchase LPG from a temporary supplier
during a qualifying emergency.
(b) The Propane Customer Bill of Rights shall be provided by every regular
supplier of LPG to the residential customer when a contract is executed.
(c) The Office of the Attorney General shall post the Propane Customer Bill of
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/18/2026 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2083
Rights on its website.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/18/2026 11:00 AM Jacketed